Utah, session 2026, HB324.
Section 1. Section 17-66-303 is amended to read:17-66-303. Fees of county officers.(1)As used in this section, "county officer" means a county officer enumerated in Section 17-66-102 except a county recorder, a county constable, or a county sheriff.(2)(a)A county officer shall collect, in advance, for exclusive county use and benefit:(i)a fee established by the county legislative body under Section 17-63-707; and(ii)any other fee authorized or required by law.(b)As long as the Children's Legal Defense Account is authorized by Section 51-9-408, the county clerk shall:(i)assess $10 in addition to whatever fee for a marriage license is established under authority of this section; and(ii)transmit $10 from each marriage license fee to the Division of Finance for deposit into the Children's Legal Defense Account.(c)(i)As long as the Division of Child and Family Services, created in Section 80-2-201, has the responsibility under Section 80-2-301 to provide services, including temporary shelter, for victims of domestic violence, the county clerk shall:(A)collect $10 in addition to whatever fee for a marriage license is established under authority of this section and in addition to the amount described in Subsection (2)(b), if an applicant chooses, as provided in Subsection (2)(c)(ii), to pay the additional $10; and(B)to the extent actually paid, transmit $10 from each marriage license fee to the Division of Finance for distribution to the Division of Child and Family Services for the operation of shelters for victims of domestic violence.(ii)(A)The county clerk shall provide a method for an applicant for a marriage license to choose to pay the additional $10 referred to in Subsection (2)(c)(i).(B)An applicant for a marriage license may choose not to pay the additional $10 referred to in Subsection (2)(c)(i) without affecting the applicant's ability to be issued a marriage license.(d)If a county operates an online marriage application system, the county clerk of that county:(i)may assess $20 in addition to the other fees for a marriage license established under this section;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (2)(d)(iii), shall transmit $20 from the marriage license fee to the state treasurer for deposit annually as follows:(A)the first $400,000 $600,000 shall accrue to the Utah Marriage Commission, created in Title 63M, Chapter 15, Utah Marriage Commission, as dedicated credits for the operation of the Utah Marriage Commission; and(B)proceeds in excess of $400,000 $600,000 shall be deposited into the General Fund; and(iii)may not transmit $20 from the marriage license fee to the state treasurer under this Subsection (2)(d) if both individuals seeking the marriage license certify that they have completed premarital counseling or education in accordance with Section 81-2-206.(3)This section does not apply to a fee currently being assessed by the state but collected by a county officer.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.